Hawaii statutes.
§385-3 Payment of benefits. Additional
unemployment benefits are payable from the fund to unemployed claimants who are
eligible under this chapter. [L 1961, c 157, pt of §1; Supp, §93B-4; HRS
§385-3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next